dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
Abbondio/T^
Abelarda/T^
Abelardo/T^
Abele/T^
Abramo/T^
Achille/T^
Adalberta/T^
Adalberto/T^
Adalgisa/T^
Adalgiso/T^
Adamo/T^
Ada/T^
Adelaide/T^
Adelchi/T^
Adelelmo/T^
Adele/T^
Adelfo/T^
Adelgardo/T^
Adelia/T^
Adelina/T^
Adelinda/T^
Adelio/T^
Adelma/T^
Adelmo/T^
Adolfo/T^
Adriana/T^
Adriano/T^
Agata/T^
Agenore/T^
Agnese/T^
Agostina/T^
Agostino/T^
Agrippa/T^
Aida/T^
Alberta/T^
Albertina/T^
Albertino/^T
Alberto/T^
Albino/T^
Alda/T^
Aldo/T^
Alessandra/T^
Alessandrina/T^
Alessandro/T^
Alessio/T^
Alex/T^
Alfio/^T
Alfonsa/T^
Alfonso/T^
Alfreda/T^
Alfredo/T^
Alice/^
Alvaro/T^
Amadio/T^
Amalia/T^
Amanda/T^
Ambrogio/T^
Amedeo/T^
Amelia/T^
Amilcare/T^
Amintore/T^
Amos/T^
Anacleto/^T
Anastasia/T^
Anastasio/T^
Ancilla/T^
Andrea/T^
Andreina/T^
Andreino/T^
Angela/T^
Angelina/T^
Angelino/T^
Angelo/T^
Angiolina/T^
Angiolino/T^
Aniceto/T^
Anita/T^
Annabella/T^
Annachiara/T^
Annalisa/T^
Annamaria/T^
Annarosa/T^
Anna/T^
Annina/T^
Anselma/T^
Anselmo/T^
Antonella/T^
Antonello/T^
Antonia/TUqrs^
Antonietta/TUqrs^
Antonino/Tqr^
Antonio/T^qr
Apollinare/T^
Apollonia/T^
Arabella/T^
Arcibaldo/T^
Arderico/T^
Arianna/T^
Aristide/T^
Armando/T^
Armida/T^
Arnaldo/T^
Arnoldo/T^
Aronne/T^
Arrigo/T^
Arturo/^Tqr
Atanasio/T^
Attilia/T^
Attilio/T^
Augusta/^
Augusto/^
Aurelia/T^
Aurelio/^Tqr
Azeglio/T^
baruffare/z
bluffare/z
c/£$
cento/"Tq
cinquanta/|!"Tq
cinquecento/"Tq
cinque/!"Tq
d/£$
diciannove/!"Tq
diciassette/!"Tq
diciotto/!"Tq
dieci/!"Tq
dodici/!"Tq
duecento/"Tq
due/!"Tq
Eberardo/T^
Edmondo/T^
Edoardo/T^
Egidio/T^
Elda/T^
Elena/T^
Eleonora/^T
Eleuterio/T^
Eliano/T^
Elia/T^
Eligio/T^
Elisabetta/T^
Eliseo/T^
Elvia/T^
Elvio/T^
Elvira/T^
Emanuela/T^
Emanuele/T^
Emidio/T^
Emiliano/T^
Emilia/T^
Emilio/T^
Emma/T^
Enrica/T^
Enrichetta/T^
Enrico/T^
Enza/T^
Enzo/T^
Eraclide/T^
Eraldo/T^
Erasmo/T^
Ercolano/T^
Ercole/T^
Eriberto/T^
Erika/T^
Ermanna/T^
Ermanno/T^
Ermenegildo/T^
Ermes/T^
Erminia/T^
Erminio/T^
Ernesta/T^
Ernestina/T^
Ernestino/T^
Ernesto/T^
Ersilia/T^
Ersilio/T^
Esmeralda/T^
Espedito/T^
Esterina/T^
Ester/T^
Ettore/T^
Eufemia/T^
Eufemio/T^
Eugenia/T^
Eugenio/T^
Eulalia/T^
Eurosia/T^
Eusebio/T^
Eustacchio/T^
Eustachio/T^
Eustorgio/T^
Evaristo/T^
Evelina/T^
Ezechiele/T^
Ezio/T^
filosofare/z
i/£
Iacopo/T^
Ida/T^
Igino/T^
Ignazia/T^
Ignazio/T^
Igor/T^
Ilaria/T^
Ilario/T^
Ildebrando/T^
Ilde/T^
Ileana/T^
Imerio/T^
Indro/T^
Ines/T^
Innocenzo/T^
Ippolito/T^
Irene/T^
Irma/T^
Isabella/T^
Isacco/T^
Isaia/T^
Isidora/T^
Isidoro/T^
Isolde/T^
Isotta/T^
Italo/T^
Ivana/T^
Ivano/T^
Ivan/T^
Ivo/T^
l/£$
m/£$
novanta/|!"Tq
novecento/"Tq
nove/!"Tq
Odetta/T^
Odoardo/T^
Ofelia/T^
Olga/T^
Olindo/T^
Ombretta/T^
Omobono/T^
Onofrio/^T
Onorina/T^
Orazio/T^
Oreste/T^
Oriana/T^
Oriano/T^
Orietta/T^
Orlando/T^qr
Oronzo/T^
Orsola/T^
Oscar/T^
Osvaldo/^T
Otello/T^
ottanta/|!"Tq
Ottaviano/T^
Ottavia/T^
Ottavio/T^
Ottilia/T^
ottocento/"Tq
otto/!"Tq
Ovidio/T^
quaranta/|!"Tq
quattordici/!"Tq
quattrocento/"Tq
quattro/!"Tq
quindici/!"Tq
ronfare/z
sedici/!"Tq
seicento/"Tq
sei/!"Tq
sessanta/|!"Tq
settanta/|!"Tq
settecento/"Tq
sette/!"Tq
tonfare/z
trecento/"Tq
tredici/!"Tq
trenta/|!"Tq
tré/!"Tq
trionfare/z
Ubalda/T^
Ubaldo/T^
Uberto/T^
Ugo/T^
Ulderico/T^
Umberto/T^
undici/!"Tq
uno/!"Tq
v/£
venti/|!"Tq
x/£$
xx/£$
xxx/£$
